Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,162
Nail technology home services; performed by licensee.

No licensee may perform nail technology home services except when employed by or under contract to a nail technology salon holding a valid nail technology home services permit.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 82;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,233;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 424.